Colorado, session 2026A, HB1269.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 17 to article
1 of title 43 as follows:
PART 17
TRANSIT ACCESS
43-1-1701. Legislative declaration.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS AND DECLARES THAT:
(a) PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION IS ESSENTIAL TO THE HEALTH,
ECONOMIC WELL-BEING, AND MOBILITY OF ALL COLORADANS AND PROVIDES
ACCESS TO EMPLOYMENT, EDUCATION, HEALTH CARE, AND OTHER ESSENTIAL
COMMUNITY RESOURCES;
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(b) DESPITE THE VITAL ROLE OF TRANSIT, MANY INDIVIDUALS FACE
SIGNIFICANT BARRIERS TO ACCESSING PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION, INCLUDING
FARE COSTS, A LACK OF CLEAR INFORMATION, AND INSUFFICIENT AMENITIES;
(c) INCREASING TRANSIT ACCESS AND EFFICIENCY IS NECESSARY TO
ENSURE THAT PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION IS ACCESSIBLE, AFFORDABLE, AND
INCLUSIVE. TRANSIT PROVIDERS MUST OFFER SERVICES THAT TREAT EVERY
RIDER WITH RESPECT AND DIGNITY, PROVIDE HIGH-QUALITY SERVICE, AND
APPLY EQUITY PRINCIPLES TO ALL OPERATIONS. EFFICIENCY IN TRANSIT
OPERATIONS IS ALSO CRITICAL TO MITIGATING CONFLICTS BETWEEN
OPERATORS AND RIDERS BY IMPROVING THE RELIABILITY AND
EFFECTIVENESS OF SERVICE.
(d) WELL-DESIGNED AND EFFICIENT TRANSIT SYSTEMS MAKE IT
EASIER FOR INDIVIDUALS TO CHOOSE PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION, THEREBY
INCREASING RIDERSHIP AND HELPING COLORADO MEET ITS CLIMATE GOALS.
IN 2024, COLORADO TRANSIT AGENCIES REPORTED A COMBINED TOTAL OF
ONE HUNDRED FOUR MILLION NINE HUNDRED ELEVEN THOUSAND SIX
HUNDRED FIFTEEN UNLINKED PASSENGER TRIPS. EXPANDING EQUITABLE
ACCESS TO TRANSIT SERVICES WILL FURTHER ENHANCE RIDERSHIP, SYSTEM
SUSTAINABILITY, AND ENVIRONMENTAL BENEFITS.
(e) ENSURING EQUITABLE ACCESS TO PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION IS A
SHARED RESPONSIBILITY AMONG THE STATE, LOCAL GOVERNMENTS, TRANSIT
AGENCIES, AND COMMUNITIES. THIS PART 17 REPRESENTS A STEP TOWARD
PROVIDING TRANSIT SERVICES THAT ARE SAFE, EFFICIENT, ACCESSIBLE, AND
INCLUSIVE, WHICH PROMOTES SOCIAL AND ECONOMIC MOBILITY,
ENVIRONMENTAL SUSTAINABILITY, AND THE OVERALL WELL-BEING OF
COLORADANS.
(2) THEREFORE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FURTHER FINDS AND
DECLARES THAT:
(a) PROMOTING TRANSIT ACCESS, EFFICIENCY, AND QUALITY SERVICE
FOR ALL TRANSIT USERS, WHILE INCREASING RIDERSHIP TO HELP MEET
CLIMATE GOALS, ARE MATTERS OF BOTH LOCAL AND STATEWIDE CONCERN;
(b) THE POLICIES IN THIS PART 17 ARE INTENDED TO ENSURE
FAIRNESS, ACCESSIBILITY, AND DIGNITY IN PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1269

THROUGHOUT THE STATE; AND
(c) THE STATE INTENDS TO COLLECT DATA AND REQUIRE REPORTING
ON THIS PART 17 TO INFORM FUTURE TRANSIT ACCESS POLICY.
43-1-1702. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 17, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "AUTOMATIC PASSENGER COUNTER" MEANS AN AUTOMATED
SYSTEM THAT COUNTS PASSENGER BOARDINGS AND ALIGHTINGS.
(2) "AUTOMATIC VEHICLE LOCATION" MEANS A SYSTEM THAT
DETERMINES VEHICLE LOCATION AND REPORTS REAL-TIME OR ARCHIVED
POSITION AND SCHEDULE ADHERENCE.
(3) "CONTACTLESS FARE MEDIA" MEANS FARE MEDIA THAT USES
NEAR-FIELD COMMUNICATION (NFC) TECHNOLOGY OR EQUIVALENT
CONTACTLESS TECHNOLOGY.
(4) "COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY" MEANS A PROVIDER OF PUBLIC
TRANSPORTATION, AS DEFINED IN 49 U.S.C. SEC. 5302 (15), OPERATING IN
THE STATE WITH AT LEAST ONE MILLION UNLINKED PASSENGER TRIPS IN THE
MOST RECENT NTD YEAR. "COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY" DOES NOT INCLUDE
THE DEPARTMENT OR ENCOMPASS ANY OF THE TRANSIT SERVICES OPERATED
BY THE DEPARTMENT AND DOES NOT INCLUDE REGIONAL TRANSPORTATION
AUTHORITIES THAT PROVIDE FUNDING FOR TRANSIT SERVICES BUT THAT DO
NOT DIRECTLY PROVIDE A TRANSIT SERVICE. A "COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY"
IS CLASSIFIED AS MEDIUM OR LARGE ACCORDING TO ITS NUMBER OF
UNLINKED PASSENGER TRIPS REPORTED IN THE MOST RECENT NTD YEAR. IF
A COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY MEETS THE MEDIUM OR LARGE THRESHOLD FOR
NUMBER OF UNLINKED PASSENGER TRIPS, THE COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY IS
CLASSIFIED AS THAT HIGHER THRESHOLD CATEGORY FOR THAT YEAR AND
THE SUBSEQUENT FIVE YEARS, NOTWITHSTANDING LATER TRIP NUMBER
DECREASES WITHIN THAT FIVE-YEAR PERIOD.
(5) "FARE MEDIA" MEANS A PHYSICAL OR DIGITAL INSTRUMENT USED
TO CONVEY PROOF OF FARE PAYMENT OR ELIGIBILITY. "FARE MEDIA"
INCLUDES MOBILE TICKETS, BAR OR QUICK RESPONSE (QR) CODES, AND
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1269

CONTACTLESS SMARTCARDS OR TOKENS.
(6) "GENERAL TRANSIT FEED SPECIFICATION" MEANS THE
STANDARDIZED DATA FORMAT USED TO PUBLISH SCHEDULE, ROUTE, AND
STOP INFORMATION, INCLUDING ITS COMPANION REAL-TIME FORMAT
REFERRED TO AS "GTFS REALTIME".
(7) "KEY TRANSIT INFORMATION" MEANS PUBLICLY AVAILABLE
INFORMATION THAT IS DISSEMINATED BY A COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY AND
THAT PROVIDES INFORMATION RELATED TO ACCESSING TRANSIT SERVICES,
INCLUDING FARE STRUCTURES, TRANSIT MAPS, SERVICE SCHEDULES, AND
THE RIGHTS AND RESPONSIBILITIES OF TRANSIT RIDERS.
(8) "LARGE COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY" MEANS A COVERED TRANSIT
AGENCY WITH TEN MILLION OR MORE UNLINKED PASSENGER TRIPS IN THE
MOST RECENT NTD YEAR.
(9) "LONG-HAUL TRANSIT ROUTE" MEANS A FIXED-ROUTE TRANSIT
ROUTE FOR WHICH THE AVERAGE SCHEDULED END-TO-END RUN TIME IS
THREE OR MORE HOURS.
(10) "MEDIUM COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY" MEANS A COVERED
TRANSIT AGENCY WITH GREATER THAN ONE MILLION BUT FEWER THAN TEN
MILLION UNLINKED PASSENGER TRIPS IN THE MOST RECENT NTD YEAR.
(11) "MOST RECENT NTD YEAR" MEANS THE MOST RECENT
CALENDAR YEAR FOR WHICH THE UNITED STATES FEDERAL TRANSIT
ADMINISTRATION HAS PUBLISHED NATIONAL TRANSIT DATABASE DATA AS OF
THE REPORTING DEADLINE.
(12) "NATIONAL TRANSIT DATABASE" OR "NTD" MEANS THE
NATIONAL TRANSIT DATABASE MAINTAINED BY THE UNITED STATES
SECRETARY OF TRANSPORTATION AS REQUIRED BY 49 U.S.C. SEC. 5335.
(13) "PARATRANSIT SERVICES" MEANS COMPLEMENTARY PARALLEL
TRANSIT SERVICES FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH DISABILITIES WHO ARE UNABLE TO
USE REGULAR OR FIXED-ROUTE TRANSIT SERVICES FOR SOME OR ALL OF
THEIR TRANSIT NEEDS.
(14) (a) "SUPPLEMENTAL ACCESSIBLE TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM"
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1269

MEANS A PROGRAM THAT IS ADMINISTERED, FUNDED, OR CONTRACTED BY A
COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY AND THAT IS DESIGNED TO PROVIDE ACCESSIBLE
TRANSPORTATION, IN ADDITION TO PARATRANSIT SERVICES, TO INDIVIDUALS
WITH DISABILITIES OR INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE ELIGIBLE UNDER THE FEDERAL
"AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT OF 1990", 42 U.S.C. SEC. 12101 ET
SEQ.
(b) "SUPPLEMENTAL ACCESSIBLE TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM"
INCLUDES A PROGRAM THAT PROVIDES TRIPS, VOUCHERS, OR SUBSIDIES
THROUGH CONTRACTED PROVIDERS OR ON-DEMAND SERVICES, INCLUDING
TAXI PROVIDERS, TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANIES, AND OTHER
THIRD-PARTY PROVIDERS.
(c) "SUPPLEMENTAL ACCESSIBLE TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM" DOES
NOT INCLUDE ON-DEMAND OR MICROTRANSIT SERVICE THAT IS FOR THE
GENERAL PUBLIC AND THAT IS NOT DESIGNED TO SERVE INDIVIDUALS WITH
DISABILITIES OR INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE ELIGIBLE UNDER THE FEDERAL
"AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT OF 1990", 42 U.S.C. SEC. 12101 ET
SEQ., EVEN IF SUCH SERVICE USES ACCESSIBLE VEHICLES.
(15) "UNLINKED PASSENGER TRIPS" MEANS THE NUMBER OF
PASSENGER BOARDINGS, COUNTING EACH BOARDING ON EACH VEHICLE AS
A SEPARATE TRIP, AS REPORTED TO THE NATIONAL TRANSIT DATABASE.
43-1-1703. Information provided to transit riders - transit maps
- fare transparency.
(1) ON AND AFTER JUNE 30, 2027, A COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY
SHALL ENSURE THAT CLEAR, UP-TO-DATE TRANSIT SYSTEM MAPS ARE
DISPLAYED AT ALL RAIL STATIONS, BUS STATIONS, AND BUS RAPID TRANSIT
STOPS. TRANSIT SYSTEM MAPS MUST SHOW ALL FIXED-ROUTE TRANSIT
ROUTES OFFERED BY THE COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY.
(2) (a) ON AND AFTER JUNE 30, 2027, A COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY
SHALL ENSURE THAT THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION IS AVAILABLE ONLINE
AND DISPLAYED IN ALL TRANSIT VEHICLES AND AT ALL RAIL STATIONS, BUS
STATIONS, AND TRANSIT STOPS WITH A COVERED SHELTER:
(I) FARE RATES AND STRUCTURES; AND
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1269

(II) ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS AND APPLICATION INSTRUCTIONS
FOR FARE DISCOUNT PROGRAMS.
(b) THE REQUIREMENT TO DISPLAY THE INFORMATION IN THIS
SUBSECTION (2) IS SATISFIED BY DISPLAYING SUMMARY INFORMATION AND
A LINK OR QUICK RESPONSE (QR) CODE TO A WEBSITE WITH DETAILED
INFORMATION.
(3) NOTHING IN THIS SECTION REQUIRES A COVERED TRANSIT
AGENCY TO REPLACE ITS EXISTING FIXED SIGNAGE, DISPLAYS, OR MAPS
SOLELY TO COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS IMPOSED BY THIS SECTION. A
COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY IS ONLY REQUIRED TO UPDATE THE INFORMATION
SHOWN ON ITS FIXED SIGNAGE, DISPLAYS, AND MAPS UPON THE REGULARLY
SCHEDULED REPLACEMENT OF SUCH SIGNAGE, DISPLAYS, OR MAPS.
43-1-1704. Information provided to transit riders - language
access.
(1) (a) ON AND AFTER JUNE 30, 2027, A COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY
SHALL ENSURE THAT ALL PUBLICLY AVAILABLE KEY TRANSIT INFORMATION
THAT IS DISSEMINATED BY THE COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY IS TRANSLATED
INTO EACH LANGUAGE THAT IS SPOKEN BY AT LEAST FIVE PERCENT OF THE
POPULATION OF ANY COUNTY IN WHICH THE COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY
OPERATES. A COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY IS ONLY REQUIRED TO PROVIDE
TRANSLATION INTO LANGUAGES THAT MEET THE FIVE PERCENT POPULATION
THRESHOLD AS OF THE MOST RECENT UNITED STATES CENSUS BUREAU
AMERICAN COMMUNITY SURVEY OR COMPARABLE CENSUS DATA FOR
INDIVIDUALS WHO BOTH SPEAK ENGLISH LESS THAN VERY WELL AND SPEAK
THE SHARED MINORITY LANGUAGE AT HOME.
(b) THE TRANSLATION REQUIREMENT IN THIS SUBSECTION (1) IS
SATISFIED BY PROVIDING A LINK OR QUICK RESPONSE (QR) CODE TO A
WEBSITE WITH THE TRANSLATED INFORMATION; EXCEPT THAT THE
TRANSLATED INFORMATION MUST BE PROVIDED IN A SUBSTANTIALLY
SIMILAR FORMAT AS THE ENGLISH INFORMATION FOR ANY LANGUAGE
SPOKEN BY AT LEAST TWENTY PERCENT OF THE POPULATION OF ANY COUNTY
IN WHICH THE COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY OPERATES, AS MEASURED BY THE
MOST RECENT UNITED STATES CENSUS BUREAU AMERICAN COMMUNITY
SURVEY OR COMPARABLE CENSUS DATA FOR INDIVIDUALS WHO BOTH SPEAK
ENGLISH LESS THAN VERY WELL AND SPEAK THE SHARED MINORITY
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1269

LANGUAGE AT HOME.
(2) A COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY MAY USE AN ALREADY EXISTING
LANGUAGE ACCESS PLAN REQUIRED BY TITLE VI OF THE FEDERAL "CIVIL
RIGHTS ACT OF 1964", 42 U.S.C. SEC. 2000d ET SEQ., OR AN EQUIVALENT
REQUIRED LANGUAGE ACCESS PLAN, TO SATISFY THE LANGUAGE ACCESS
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING TO DETERMINE WHAT
MATERIALS MUST BE TRANSLATED AND INTO WHICH LANGUAGES.
(3) TRANSLATIONS MUST BE LINGUISTICALLY ACCURATE,
CULTURALLY APPROPRIATE, AND TECHNICALLY CONSISTENT WITH THE
ORIGINAL INFORMATION.
43-1-1705. Reporting.
(1) (a) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31, 2028, AND ON OR BEFORE EACH
JANUARY 31 THEREAFTER, A COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY SHALL REPORT TO
THE GOVERNOR AND TO A JOINT MEETING OF THE HOUSE OF
REPRESENTATIVES TRANSPORTATION, HOUSING, AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT
COMMITTEE AND THE SENATE TRANSPORTATION AND ENERGY COMMITTEE,
OR THEIR SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES. THE REPORT MUST INCLUDE
INFORMATION FOR THE MOST RECENT NTD YEAR ON THE RELEVANT
REQUIREMENTS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) A COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY SHALL MAKE THE REPORT
REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION AVAILABLE ON A PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE
WEBSITE.
(2) (a) THE ANNUAL REPORT OF A MEDIUM COVERED TRANSIT
AGENCY MUST INCLUDE:
(I) A NARRATIVE ABOUT THE COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY'S PROGRESS
TOWARD IMPLEMENTING SECTIONS 43-1-1703 AND 43-1-1704;
(II) THE COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY'S ANNUAL RIDERSHIP,
INCLUDING THE NUMBER OF UNLINKED PASSENGER TRIPS;
(III) INFORMATION ON THE COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY'S
MECHANISMS OR PROGRAMS FOR PROVIDING RELIABLE TRANSIT ACCESS TO
LOW-INCOME HOUSEHOLDS AND INDIVIDUALS EXPERIENCING
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1269

HOMELESSNESS, INCLUDING IDENTIFICATION OF BARRIERS TO ACCESS;
(IV) A SUMMARY OF THE AVAILABILITY OF SERVICES OPERATED BY
THE COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY, INCLUDING ANY NOTABLE CHANGES TO
ROUTES, STOPS, SCHEDULES, SPANS OF SERVICE, OR FREQUENCY OF SERVICE
TO IMPROVE ACCESS;
(V) RIDERSHIP CHARACTERISTICS, INCLUDING FROM ANY CUSTOMER
SURVEYS;
(VI) ANY SERVICE PERFORMANCE INDICATORS COLLECTED BY THE
COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY, INCLUDING ON-TIME PERFORMANCE, MISSED
TRIPS, AND SCHEDULED REVENUE HOURS BY TRANSIT MODE; AND
(VII) A NARRATIVE OF HOW THE COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY IS
WORKING TO MEET THE GOAL OF PROVIDING ACCESSIBLE TRANSPORTATION
SERVICES THAT ARE COMMENSURATE WITH FIXED-ROUTE SERVICES AND A
SUMMARY OF PARATRANSIT SERVICES AND ANY SUPPLEMENTAL ACCESSIBLE
TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM THAT INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING METRICS:
(A) TOTAL REQUESTED TRIPS;
(B) TOTAL COMPLETED TRIPS;
(C) MISSED TRIPS;
(D) DENIED TRIPS;
(E) LATE PASSENGER PICKUPS AND LATE PASSENGER DROP-OFFS;
(F) EXCESSIVE RIDE TIME RELATIVE TO FIXED-ROUTE TRAVEL TIME;
(G) ON-TIME PERFORMANCE;
(H) PERFORMANCE OF CALL CENTERS SUPPORTING PARATRANSIT
SERVICES OR ANY SUPPLEMENTAL ACCESSIBLE TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM,
INCLUDING AVERAGE HOLD TIMES, CALL ABANDONMENT RATES, AND THE
PERCENTAGE OF CALLS ANSWERED WITHIN TARGET RESPONSE TIMES; AND
(I) ANY ADDITIONAL REPORTING OR COMPLIANCE METRICS REQUIRED
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1269

BY THE UNITED STATES FEDERAL TRANSIT ADMINISTRATION FOR
COMPLEMENTARY PARATRANSIT SERVICES REQUIRED BY THE FEDERAL
"AMERICANS WITH DISABILITIES ACT OF 1990", 42 U.S.C. SEC. 12101 ET
SEQ.
(b) THE ANNUAL REPORT OF A LARGE COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY
MUST INCLUDE:
(I) ALL OF THE INFORMATION DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF
THIS SECTION;
(II) AUTOMATIC PASSENGER COUNTER DATA FOR EACH FIXED-ROUTE
SERVICE, INCLUDING BOARDINGS BY ROUTE;
(III) A FARE PRODUCT UTILIZATION TABLE;
(IV) A LANGUAGE ACCESS INVENTORY;
(V) RESTROOM ACCESS METRICS THAT INCLUDE:
(A) THE AVAILABILITY OF RESTROOMS AND ACCESS TO RESTROOMS
FOR TRANSIT RIDERS AND TRANSIT OPERATORS FOR ALL ROUTES;
(B) A SUMMARY OF TRANSIT OPERATOR RELIEF POLICIES;
(C) THE NUMBER OF FIXED-ROUTE LONG HAUL TRIPS OPERATED
WHILE AN ONBOARD RESTROOM WAS OUT OF SERVICE; AND
(D) FOR PARATRANSIT SERVICES AND ANY SUPPLEMENTAL
ACCESSIBLE TRANSPORTATION PROGRAM, A SUMMARY OF THE POLICIES AND
PRACTICES REGARDING RESTROOM ACCESS DURING TRIPS AND THE NUMBER
OF CUSTOMER COMPLAINTS OR INCIDENT REPORTS RELATING TO RESTROOM
ACCESS; AND
(VI) A SUMMARY OF CUSTOMER FEEDBACK, INCLUDING THE NUMBER
OF ANNUAL COMPLAINTS FILED AND THE TOP THREE COMPLAINT
CATEGORIES.
(3) (a) A COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY IS REQUIRED TO REPORT ONLY
INFORMATION THAT THE TRANSIT AGENCY ALREADY COLLECTS. IF A
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1269

COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY DOES NOT COLLECT A TYPE OF INFORMATION
REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION ON WHICH IT WOULD
OTHERWISE BE REQUIRED TO REPORT, THE COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY SHALL
REPORT THAT INFORMATION AS "NOT COLLECTED". NOTHING IN THIS
SECTION REQUIRES ADDITIONAL DATA COLLECTION.
(b) A COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY SHALL PREPARE THE ANNUAL
REPORT REQUIRED BY THIS SECTION USING INFORMATION THAT THE COVERED
TRANSIT AGENCY ALREADY COLLECTS, WHICH MAY INCLUDE:
(I) NATIONAL TRANSIT DATABASE SUBMISSIONS;
(II) GENERAL TRANSIT FEED SPECIFICATION DATASETS OR ARCHIVES;
(III) FARE MEDIA SALES, VALIDATIONS, OR CONTACTLESS FARE
MEDIA TAP RECORDS;
(IV) AUTOMATIC PASSENGER COUNT AND AUTOMATIC VEHICLE
LOCATION OUTPUTS;
(V) CUSTOMER SURVEYS;
(VI) CUSTOMER COMPLAINT LOGS; AND
(VII) WRITTEN POLICIES.
(c) A COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY MAY SATISFY ANY OF THE
INFORMATION REQUIRED TO BE REPORTED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION BY
REFERENCING OR INCLUDING A LINK TO AN OFFICIAL REPORT THAT INCLUDES
THE REQUIRED INFORMATION, SO LONG AS THAT OFFICIAL REPORT IS POSTED
ON THE COVERED TRANSIT AGENCY'S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE WEBSITE.
(4) NOTWITHSTANDING THE REQUIREMENT IN SECTION 24-1-136
(11)(a)(I), THE REQUIREMENT TO SUBMIT THE REPORT REQUIRED IN THIS
SECTION CONTINUES INDEFINITELY.
SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1269

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1269